District of Columbia statutes.
44-710

Mayor authorized to visit, investigate and report on certain organizations.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to visit, investigate the management of, and have a report of the receipts and expenditures of the Columbia Hospital for Women and Lying-in Asylum, the Children’s Hospital, Saint Ann’s Infant Asylum, National Association for Colored Women and Children, Women’s Christian Association, Little Sisters of the Poor, and the German Orphan Asylum, so long as they respectively accept money appropriated by Congress for their aid.

History

June 4, 1880, 21 Stat. 157, ch. 121, § 1

Cross References

Public welfare supervision, board of public welfare, institutions supported by congressional appropriations, see § 4-111.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1202.
1973 Ed., § 32-1002.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.